District of Columbia statutes.
44-662.02

Hospital Fund.

(a)

There is established as a special fund the Hospital Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Department in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

(b)

Revenue from the following sources shall be deposited in the Fund:

(1)

Fees collected under this chapter;

(2)

Interest and penalties collected under this chapter; and

(3)

Other amounts collected under this chapter.

(c)

Money in the Fund shall be used solely as set forth in § 44-662.03.

(d)

(1)

The money deposited in the Fund, and interest earned, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time.

(2)

Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation; provided, that any remaining money in the Fund at the end of each fiscal year shall be refunded to hospitals in proportion to the amounts paid by them.

History

Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 5073, 62 DCR 10905